Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6022.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that statewide policies collectively known as "JR-25" have failed to provide rehabilitation to young adults and have contributed to the overpopulation crisis in the juvenile rehabilitation administration. Additionally, these policies have also contributed to increases in violence at Green Hill School, increases in contraband, and inappropriate contact between staff and incarcerated individuals.The legislature further finds that as Washington's budget crisis continues, the yearly cost of rehabilitating offenders within the department of children, youth, and families is nearly four times the cost of rehabilitating offenders within the department of corrections. The legislature recognizes that the average cost per incarcerated individual at the department of corrections is approximately $76,000. By comparison, the average cost per incarcerated individual at the department of children, youth, and families is approximately $257,000.Because of the detrimental impact that the JR-25 policy has had on Washington state and incarcerated youth, the legislature hereby repeals these collective policies.Sec. 2. RCW 13.04.030 and 2024 c 232 s 2 and 2024 c 117 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in this section, the juvenile courts in this state shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over all proceedings:(a) Under the interstate compact on placement of children as provided in chapter 26.34 RCW;(b) Relating to children alleged or found to be dependent as provided in chapter 26.44 RCW and in RCW 13.34.030 through 13.34.161;(c) Relating to the termination of a parent and child relationship as provided in RCW 13.34.180 through 13.34.210;(d) To approve or disapprove out-of-home placement as provided in RCW 13.32A.170;(e) Relating to juveniles alleged or found to have committed offenses, traffic or civil infractions, or violations as provided in RCW 13.40.020 through 13.40.230, unless:(i) The juvenile court transfers jurisdiction of a particular juvenile to adult criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110;(ii) The statute of limitations applicable to adult prosecution for the offense, traffic or civil infraction, or violation has expired;(iii) The alleged offense or infraction is a traffic, fish, boating, or game offense, or traffic or civil infraction committed by a juvenile 16 years of age or older and would, if committed by an adult, be tried or heard in a court of limited jurisdiction, in which instance the appropriate court of limited jurisdiction shall have jurisdiction over the alleged offense or infraction, and no guardian ad litem is required in any such proceeding due to the juvenile's age. If such an alleged offense or infraction and an alleged offense or infraction subject to juvenile court jurisdiction arise out of the same event or incident, the juvenile court may have jurisdiction of both matters. The jurisdiction under this subsection does not constitute "transfer" or a "decline" for purposes of RCW 13.40.110 (1) or (2) or (e)(i) of this subsection. Courts of limited jurisdiction which confine juveniles for an alleged offense or infraction may place juveniles in juvenile detention facilities under an agreement with the officials responsible for the administration of the juvenile detention facility in RCW 13.04.035 and 13.20.060;(iv) The alleged offense is a traffic or civil infraction, a violation of compulsory school attendance provisions under chapter 28A.225 RCW, or a misdemeanor, and a court of limited jurisdiction has assumed concurrent jurisdiction over those offenses as provided in RCW 13.04.0301; or(v) The juvenile is 16 or 17 years old on the date the alleged offense is committed and the alleged offense is:(A) A serious violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;(B) A violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 and the juvenile has a criminal history consisting of: (I) One or more prior serious violent offenses; (II) two or more prior violent offenses; or (III) three or more of any combination of the following offenses: Any class A felony, any class B felony, vehicular assault, or manslaughter in the second degree, all of which must have been committed after the juvenile's 13th birthday and prosecuted separately; ((or))(C) ((Rape of a child in the first degree))Robbery in the first degree, rape of a child in the first degree, or drive-by shooting, committed on or after July 1, 1997;(D) Burglary in the first degree committed on or after July 1, 1997, and the juvenile has a criminal history consisting of one or more prior felony or misdemeanor offenses; or(E) Any violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 committed on or after July 1, 1997, and the juvenile is alleged to have been armed with a firearm.(I) In such a case the adult criminal court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction, except as provided in (e)(v)(((C)))(E)(II) and (III) of this subsection.(II) The juvenile court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the disposition of any remaining charges in any case in which the juvenile is found not guilty in the adult criminal court of the charge or charges for which he or she was transferred, or is convicted in the adult criminal court of an offense that is not also an offense listed in (e)(v) of this subsection. The juvenile court shall ((maintain residual))enter an order extending juvenile court jurisdiction ((up to age 25)) if the juvenile has turned 18 years of age during the adult criminal court proceedings ((but only for the purpose of returning a case to juvenile court for disposition)) pursuant to RCW 13.40.300(2)(a)(ii). However, once the case is returned to juvenile court, the court may hold a decline hearing pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 to determine whether to retain the case in juvenile court for the purpose of disposition or return the case to adult criminal court for sentencing.(III) The prosecutor and respondent may agree to juvenile court jurisdiction and waive application of exclusive adult criminal jurisdiction in (e)(v)(A) through (((C)))(E) of this subsection and remove the proceeding back to juvenile court with the court's approval.If the juvenile challenges the state's determination of the juvenile's criminal history under (e)(v) of this subsection, the state may establish the offender's criminal history by a preponderance of the evidence. If the criminal history consists of adjudications entered upon a plea of guilty, the state shall not bear a burden of establishing the knowing and voluntariness of the plea;(f) Under the interstate compact on juveniles as provided in chapter 13.24 RCW;(g) Relating to termination of a diversion agreement under RCW 13.40.080, including a proceeding in which the divertee has attained 18 years of age;(h) Relating to court validation of a voluntary consent to an out-of-home placement under chapter 13.34 RCW, by the parent or Indian custodian of an Indian child, except if the parent or Indian custodian and child are residents of or domiciled within the boundaries of a federally recognized Indian reservation over which the tribe exercises exclusive jurisdiction; and(i) Relating to petitions to compel disclosure of information filed by the department of social and health services pursuant to RCW 74.13.042.(2) The family court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction with the juvenile court over all proceedings under this section if the superior court judges of a county authorize concurrent jurisdiction as provided in RCW 26.12.010.(3) The juvenile court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction with the family or probate court over minor guardianship proceedings under chapter 11.130 RCW and parenting plans or residential schedules under chapter 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW as provided for in RCW 13.34.155.(4) A juvenile subject to adult superior court jurisdiction under subsection (1)(e)(i) through (v) of this section, who is detained pending trial, may be detained in a detention facility as defined in RCW 13.40.020 pending sentencing or a dismissal.(5) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section deprives the superior courts in this state of original jurisdiction granted by the Constitution or by other laws.Sec. 3. RCW 13.40.0357 and 2023 c 295 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORYjuveniledispositionoffensecategorydescription (rcw citation)juvenile dispositioncategory forattempt, bailjump,conspiracy, orsolicitationÂ Arson and Malicious MischiefÂ AArson 1 (9A.48.020)B+Â BArson 2 (9A.48.030)CÂ CReckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040)DÂ DReckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050)EÂ BMalicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070)CÂ CMalicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080)DÂ DMalicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090)EÂ ETampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus (9.40.100)EÂ ETampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus with Intent to Commit Arson (9.40.105)EÂ APossession of Incendiary Device (9.40.120)B+Â Â Assault and Other Crimes Involving Physical HarmÂ Â AAssault 1 (9A.36.011)B+Â B+Assault 2 (9A.36.021)C+Â C+Assault 3 (9A.36.031)D+Â D+Assault 4 (9A.36.041)EÂ B+Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) ((committed at age 15 or under))C+Â ((A++Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) committed at age 16 or 17A))Â D+Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050)EÂ C+Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060)D+Â D+Coercion (9A.36.070)EÂ C+Custodial Assault (9A.36.100)D+Â Â Burglary and TrespassÂ Â B+Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) ((committed atage 15 or under))C+Â ((A-Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) committed atage 16 or 17B+))Â BResidential Burglary (9A.52.025)CÂ BBurglary 2 (9A.52.030)CÂ DBurglary Tools (Possession of) (9A.52.060)EÂ DCriminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070)EÂ ECriminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080)EÂ CMineral Trespass (78.44.330)CÂ CVehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095)DÂ DVehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100)EÂ Â DrugsÂ Â EPossession/Consumption of Alcohol (66.44.270)EÂ CIllegally Obtaining Legend Drug (69.41.020)DÂ C+Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug with Intent to Sell (69.41.030(2)(a))D+Â EPossession of LegendDrug (69.41.030(2)(b))EÂ B+Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Sale (69.50.401(2) (a) or (b))B+Â CViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale (69.50.401(2)(c))CÂ EPossession of Cannabis <40 grams (69.50.4014)EÂ CFraudulently Obtaining Controlled Substance (69.50.403)CÂ C+Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit (69.50.410)C+Â EUnlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020)EÂ BViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Counterfeit Substances (69.50.4011(2) (a) or (b))BÂ CViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit Substances (69.50.4011(2) (c), (d), or (e))CÂ EViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance (69.50.4013)EÂ CViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance (69.50.4012)CÂ Â Firearms and WeaponsÂ Â BTheft of Firearm (9A.56.300)CÂ BPossession of Stolen Firearm(9A.56.310)CÂ ECarrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit (9.41.050)EÂ CPossession of Firearms by Minor (<18) (9.41.040(2)(a) (v))CÂ D+Possession of Dangerous Weapon (9.41.250)EÂ DIntimidating Another Person by use of Weapon (9.41.270)EÂ Â HomicideÂ Â A+Murder 1 (9A.32.030)AÂ A+Murder 2 (9A.32.050)B+Â B+Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060)C+Â C+Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070)D+Â B+Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520)C+Â Â KidnappingÂ Â AKidnap 1 (9A.40.020)B+Â B+Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030)C+Â C+Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)D+Â Â Obstructing Governmental OperationÂ Â DObstructing a Law Enforcement Officer (9A.76.020)EÂ EResisting Arrest (9A.76.040)EÂ BIntroducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140)CÂ CIntroducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150)DÂ EIntroducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160)EÂ B+Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180)C+Â B+Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)C+Â Â Public DisturbanceÂ Â C+Criminal Mischief with Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(b))D+Â D+Criminal Mischief Without Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(a))EÂ EFailure to Disperse (9A.84.020)EÂ EDisorderly Conduct (9A.84.030)EÂ Â Sex CrimesÂ Â ARape 1 (9A.44.040)B+Â ((B++Rape 2 (9A.44.050) committed at age 14 or underB+))Â A-Rape 2 (9A.44.050) ((committed at age 15 through age 17))B+Â C+Rape 3 (9A.44.060)D+Â ((B++Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073)committed at age 14 or underB+))Â A-Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073)((committed at age 15))B+Â B+Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076)C+Â BIncest 1 (9A.64.020(1))CÂ CIncest 2 (9A.64.020(2))DÂ D+Indecent Exposure (Victim <14) (9A.88.010)EÂ EIndecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over) (9A.88.010)EÂ B+Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070)C+Â C+Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080)D+Â EO & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030)EÂ B+Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100)C+Â ((B++Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) committed at age 14 or underB+))Â A-Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) ((committed at age 15 through age 17))B+Â BChild Molestation 2 (9A.44.086)C+Â CFailure to Register as a Sex Offender (9A.44.132)DÂ Â Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and ForgeryÂ Â BTheft 1 (9A.56.030)CÂ CTheft 2 (9A.56.040)DÂ DTheft 3 (9A.56.050)EÂ BTheft of Livestock 1 and 2 (9A.56.080 and 9A.56.083)CÂ CForgery (9A.60.020)DÂ ARobbery 1 (9A.56.200) ((committed atage 15 or under))B+Â ((A++Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) committed atage 16 or 17A))Â B+Robbery 2 (9A.56.210)C+Â B+Extortion 1 (9A.56.120)C+Â C+Extortion 2 (9A.56.130)D+Â CIdentity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2))DÂ DIdentity Theft 2 (9.35.020(3))EÂ DImproperly Obtaining Financial Information (9.35.010)EÂ BPossession of a Stolen Vehicle (9A.56.068)CÂ BPossession of Stolen Property 1 (9A.56.150)CÂ CPossession of Stolen Property 2 (9A.56.160)DÂ DPossession of Stolen Property 3 (9A.56.170)EÂ BTaking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (9A.56.070)CÂ CTaking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (9A.56.075)DÂ BTheft of a Motor Vehicle (9A.56.065)CÂ Â Motor Vehicle Related CrimesÂ Â EDriving Without a License (46.20.005)EÂ B+Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a))C+Â CHit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b))DÂ DHit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5))EÂ EHit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010)EÂ CVehicular Assault (46.61.522)DÂ CAttempting to Elude Pursuing Police Vehicle (46.61.024)DÂ EReckless Driving (46.61.500)EÂ DDriving While Under the Influence (46.61.502 and 46.61.504)EÂ B+Felony Driving While Under the Influence (46.61.502(6))BÂ B+Felony Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (46.61.504(6))BÂ Â OtherÂ Â BAnimal Cruelty 1 (16.52.205)CÂ BBomb Threat (9.61.160)CÂ CEscape 11 (9A.76.110)CÂ CEscape 21 (9A.76.120)CÂ DEscape 3 (9A.76.130)EÂ EObscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls (9.61.230)EÂ AOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class A FelonyB+Â BOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class B FelonyCÂ COther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class C FelonyDÂ DOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Gross MisdemeanorEÂ EOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult MisdemeanorEÂ VViolation of Order of Restitution, Community Supervision, or Confinement (13.40.200)2 V1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses and the standard range is established as follows:1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - ((28 days))4 weeks confinement2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks confinement2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDSThis schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may select sentencing option A, B, C, or D.Â Â OPTION AJUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRIDSTANDARD RANGEÂ ((A++129 to 260 weeks for all category A++ offenses))Â A+180 weeks to age 21 for all category A+ offensesÂ A103-129 weeks for all category A offensesÂ A-((30-40 weeks52-65 weeks80-100 weeks103-129 weeks103-129 weeksÂ B++))15-36 weeks Except 30-40 weeks for 15 to 17 year olds52-65 weeks80-100 weeks103-129 weeks103-129 weeksCURRENTB+15-36 weeks15-36 weeks52-65 weeks80-100 weeks103-129 weeksOFFENSEBLSLS15-36 weeks15-36 weeks52-65 weeksCATEGORYC+LSLSLS15-36 weeks15-36 weeksÂ CLSLSLSLS15-36 weeksÂ D+LSLSLSLSLSÂ DLSLSLSLSLSÂ ELSLSLSLSLSPRIOR01234 or moreADJUDICATIONSÂ Â Â NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement. "LS" means "local sanctions" as defined in RCW 13.40.020.(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category. The current offense category is determined by the offense of adjudication.(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications and the row defined by the current offense category.(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense.(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.OROPTION BSUSPENDED DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE(1) If the offender is subject to a standard range disposition involving confinement by the department, the court may impose the standard range and suspend the disposition on condition that the offender comply with one or more local sanctions and any educational or treatment requirement. The treatment programs provided to the offender must be either research-based best practice programs as identified by the Washington state institute for public policy or the joint legislative audit and review committee, or for chemical dependency treatment programs or services, they must be evidence-based or research-based best practice programs. For the purposes of this subsection:(a) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the population; and(b) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the standard of evidence-based practices.(2) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition, the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.(3) An offender is ineligible for the suspended disposition option under this section if the offender is:(a) ((Is adjudicated))Adjudicated of an A+ ((or A++)) offense;(b) ((Is fourteen))14 years of age or older and is adjudicated of one or more of the following offenses:(i) A class A offense, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit a class A offense;(ii) Manslaughter in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.060); or(iii) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021), extortion in the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120), kidnapping in the second degree (RCW 9A.40.030), robbery in the second degree (RCW 9A.56.210), residential burglary (RCW 9A.52.025), burglary in the second degree (RCW 9A.52.030), drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045), vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), hit and run death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a)), intimidating a witness (RCW 9A.72.110), violation of the uniform controlled substances act (RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) and (b)), or manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070) when the offense includes infliction of bodily harm upon another or when, during the commission or immediate withdrawal from the offense, the respondent was armed with a deadly weapon; ((or(iv) Violation of the uniform controlled substances act (RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) and (b)), when the offense includes infliction of bodily harm upon another or when during the commission or immediate withdrawal from the offense the respondent was armed with a deadly weapon;))(c) ((Is ordered))Ordered to serve a disposition for a firearm violation under RCW 13.40.193; or(d) ((Is adjudicated))Adjudicated of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030((; or(e) Has a prior option B disposition)).OROPTION CCHEMICAL DEPENDENCY/MENTAL HEALTH DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVEIf the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed ((a B++))an A- or B+ offense, the court may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.OROPTION DMANIFEST INJUSTICEIf the court determines that a disposition under option A, B, or C would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).Sec. 4. RCW 13.40.110 and 2024 c 117 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Discretionary decline hearing - The prosecutor, respondent, or the court on its own motion may, before a hearing on the information on its merits, file a motion requesting the court to transfer the respondent for adult criminal prosecution and the matter shall be set for a hearing on the question of declining jurisdiction ((only if:(a) The respondent was, at the time of the alleged offense, at least 15 years of age or older and is charged with a serious violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;(b) The respondent was, at the time of the alleged offense, 14 years of age or younger and is charged with murder in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.030), and/or murder in the second degree (RCW 9A.32.050); or(c) The respondent is any age and is charged with custodial assault, RCW 9A.36.100, and, at the time the respondent is charged, is already serving a minimum juvenile sentence to age 21)).(2) Mandatory decline hearing - Unless waived by the court, the parties, and their counsel, a decline hearing shall be held when ((the)):(a) The respondent is 16 or 17 years of age and the information alleges a class A felony or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a class A felony;(b) The respondent is 17 years of age and the information alleges assault in the second degree, extortion in the first degree, indecent liberties, child molestation in the second degree, kidnapping in the second degree, or robbery in the second degree; or(c) The information alleges an escape by the respondent and the respondent is serving a minimum juvenile sentence to age 21.(3) The court after a decline hearing may order the case transferred for adult criminal prosecution upon a finding that the declination would be in the best interest of the juvenile or the public. The court shall consider the relevant reports, facts, opinions, and arguments presented by the parties and their counsel.(4) When the respondent is transferred for criminal prosecution or retained for prosecution in juvenile court, the court shall set forth in writing its finding which shall be supported by relevant facts and opinions produced at the hearing.Sec. 5. RCW 13.40.193 and 2023 c 295 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If a respondent is found to have been in possession of a firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(v), the court shall impose a minimum disposition of ten days of confinement. If the offender's standard range of disposition for the offense as indicated in RCW 13.40.0357 is more than thirty days of confinement, the court shall commit the offender to the department for the standard range disposition. The offender shall not be released until the offender has served a minimum of ten days in confinement.(2)(a) If a respondent is found to have been in possession of a firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040, the disposition must include a requirement that the respondent participate in a qualifying program as described in (b) of this subsection, when available, unless the court makes a written finding based on the outcome of the juvenile court risk assessment that participation in a qualifying program would not be appropriate.(b) For purposes of this section, "qualifying program" means an aggression replacement training program, a functional family therapy program, or another program applicable to the juvenile firearm offender population that has been identified as evidence-based or research-based and cost-beneficial in the current list prepared at the direction of the legislature by the Washington state institute for public policy.(3) If the court finds that the respondent or an accomplice was armed with a firearm, the court shall determine the standard range disposition for the offense pursuant to RCW 13.40.160. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm when the offender committed any felony other than possession of a machine gun or bump-fire stock, possession of a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, or use of a machine gun or bump-fire stock in a felony, the following periods of total confinement must be added to the sentence: (((a) Except for (b) of this subsection, for))For a class A felony, six months; for a class B felony, four months; and for a class C felony, two months((; (b) for any violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, committed by a respondent who is sixteen or seventeen years old at the time of the offense, a period of twelve months)). The additional time shall be imposed regardless of the offense's juvenile disposition offense category as designated in RCW 13.40.0357.(4)(((a) If the court finds that the respondent who is sixteen or seventeen years old and committed the offense of robbery in the first degree, drive-by shooting, rape of a child in the first degree, burglary in the first degree, or any violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 and was armed with a firearm, and the court finds that the respondent's participation was related to membership in a criminal street gang or advancing the benefit, aggrandizement, gain, profit, or other advantage for a criminal street gang, a period of three months total confinement must be added to the sentence. The additional time must be imposed regardless of the offense's juvenile disposition offense category as designated in RCW 13.40.0357 and must be served consecutively with any other sentencing enhancement.(b) For the purposes of this section, "criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization, association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol, having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their members or agents.(5))) When a disposition under this section would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court may impose another disposition. When a judge finds a manifest injustice and imposes a disposition of confinement exceeding thirty days, the court shall commit the juvenile to a maximum term, and the provisions of RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used to determine the range. When a judge finds a manifest injustice and imposes a disposition of confinement less than thirty days, the disposition shall be comprised of confinement or community supervision or both.(((6)))(5) Any term of confinement ordered pursuant to this section shall run consecutively to any term of confinement imposed in the same disposition for other offenses.Sec. 6. RCW 13.40.300 and 2024 c 117 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((Except as provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection,))In no case may a juvenile offender ((may not)) be committed by the juvenile court to the department for placement in a juvenile rehabilitation facility beyond the juvenile offender's 21st birthday.(((a) A juvenile offender adjudicated of an A++ juvenile disposition category offense listed in RCW 13.40.0357, or found to be armed with a firearm and sentenced to an additional 12 months pursuant to RCW 13.40.193(3)(b), may be committed by the juvenile court to the department for placement in a juvenile rehabilitation facility up to the juvenile offender's 25th birthday, but not beyond.(b) A juvenile offender adjudicated of a murder in the first or second degree offense committed at age 14 or older or a juvenile offender adjudicated of a rape in the first degree offense committed at age 15 or older may be committed by the juvenile court to the department for placement in a juvenile rehabilitation facility up to the juvenile offender's 23rd birthday, but not beyond.(c) A juvenile offender who is 18 or older at the time of the adjudication may be committed by the juvenile court to the department for placement in a juvenile rehabilitation facility up to the juvenile offender's 23rd birthday, but not beyond, in order to serve a standard range disposition.))(2)(a) The juvenile court has jurisdiction over, and may place an individual under the authority of the department in the following circumstances:(i) Except as provided under RCW 13.04.030 and 13.40.110, when the individual is under the age of 21 at the time of the filing of the information and is accused of committing a criminal offense that occurred when the individual was under the age of 18; or(ii) If proceedings are pending in a case in which jurisdiction is vested in the adult criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.04.030 and an automatic extension is required because either:(A) The individual is found not guilty of the charge for which he or she was transferred, or is convicted in the adult criminal court of an offense that is not also an offense listed in RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(v), and the matter is transferred to juvenile court pursuant to RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(v)(((C)))(E)(II); or(B) The parties agree to juvenile court jurisdiction with the court's approval pursuant to RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(v)(((C)))(E)(III).(b) Upon a finding of guilt in juvenile court, the juvenile court maintains jurisdiction to allow for imposition, execution, and enforcement of the court's order of disposition, subject to the limitations in this section.(((3) If an order of disposition imposes a commitment to the department for a juvenile offender:(a) Adjudicated of an A++ juvenile disposition category offense listed in RCW 13.40.0357, adjudicated of a murder in the first or second degree offense committed at age 14 or older, or found to be armed with a firearm and sentenced to an additional 12 months pursuant to RCW 13.40.193(3)(b), then jurisdiction for parole is automatically extended to include a period of up to 24 months of parole, in no case extending beyond the offender's 25th birthday; or(b) Adjudicated of a rape in the first degree offense committed at age 15 or older, then jurisdiction for parole is automatically extended to include a period of no less than 24 months and no more than 36 months of parole, in no case extending beyond the offender's 25th birthday.(4) Pursuant to the terms of RCW 13.40.190, the juvenile court maintains jurisdiction beyond the juvenile offender's 21st birthday for the purpose of enforcing an order of restitution or penalty assessment))(c) If an order of disposition imposes commitment to the department, then jurisdiction is automatically extended to include a period of up to 12 months of parole, in no case extending beyond the offender's 21st birthday.(3) If the juvenile court previously has extended jurisdiction beyond the juvenile offender's 18th birthday and that period of extension has not expired, the court may further extend jurisdiction by written order setting forth its reasons.(((5) Except as otherwise provided herein, in))(4) In no event may the juvenile court have authority to extend jurisdiction over any juvenile offender beyond the juvenile offender's 21st birthday except for the purpose of enforcing an order of restitution or penalty assessment.(((6)))(5) Notwithstanding any extension of jurisdiction over a person pursuant to this section, the juvenile court has no jurisdiction over any offenses alleged to have been committed by a person 18 years of age or older.Sec. 7. RCW 72.01.410 and 2019 c 322 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Whenever any person is convicted as an adult in the courts of this state of a felony offense committed under the age of ((eighteen))18, and is committed for a term of confinement, that person shall be initially placed in a facility operated by the department of ((children, youth, and families. The department of corrections shall))corrections to determine the person's earned release date.(a) If the earned release date is prior to the person's 21st birthday, the department of corrections shall transfer the person to the custody of the department of children, youth, and families, or to such other institution as is now or may hereafter be authorized by law to receive such person, until such time as the person completes the ordered term of confinement or arrives at the age of 21 years.(i) While in the custody of the department of children, youth, and families, the person must have the same treatment, housing options, transfer, and access to program resources as any other person committed to that juvenile correctional facility or institution pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW. ((Except as provided under (d) of this subsection, treatment))Treatment, placement, and program decisions shall be at the sole discretion of the department of children, youth, and families. The person shall ((not))only be transferred to the custody of the department of corrections ((without))with the approval of the department of children, youth, and families ((until the))or when the person reaches the age of ((twenty-five))21.(((b)))(ii) If the person's sentence includes a term of community custody, the department of children, youth, and families shall not release the person to community custody until the department of corrections has approved the person's release plan pursuant to RCW 9.94A.729(5)(b). If a person is held past ((his or her))their earned release date pending release plan approval, the department of children, youth, and families shall retain custody until a plan is approved or the person completes the ordered term of confinement prior to age ((twenty-five))21.(((c)))(iii) If the department of children, youth, and families determines that retaining custody of the person in a facility of the department of children, youth, and families presents a ((significant)) safety risk, the department of children, youth, and families may transfer and return the person to the custody of the department of corrections.(((d) The))(b) If the person's earned release date is on or after the person's 21st birthday, the department of corrections shall, with the consent of the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families, transfer the person to a facility or institution operated by the department of children, youth, and families. Despite the transfer, the department of corrections ((must retain))retains authority over custody decisions ((relating to a person whose earned release date is on or after the person's twenty-fifth birthday and who is placed in a facility operated by the department of children, youth, and families under this section, unless the person qualifies for partial confinement under RCW 72.01.412,)) and must approve any leave from the facility. When the person turns age ((twenty-five))21, ((he or she))the person must be transferred back to the department of corrections((, except as described under RCW 72.01.412)). The department of children, youth, and families has all routine and day-to-day operations authority for the person while the person is in its custody.(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, a person under the age of ((eighteen who is transferred to the custody of))18 convicted in adult criminal court and who is committed to a term of confinement at the department of corrections must be placed in a housing unit, or a portion of a housing unit, that is separated from ((other persons in custody))offenders who are ((eighteen))18 years of age or older, until the person reaches the age of ((eighteen))18.(b) ((A person))An offender who ((is transferred to the custody of the department of corrections and)) reaches ((eighteen))18 years of age may remain in a housing unit for ((persons))offenders under the age of ((eighteen))18 if the secretary of corrections determines that: (i) The ((person's))offender's needs and the ((rehabilitation))correctional goals for the ((person))offender could continue to be better met by the programs and housing environment that is separate from ((other persons in custody))offenders who are ((eighteen))18 years of age and older; and (ii) the programs or housing environment for ((persons))offenders under the age of ((eighteen))18 will not be substantially affected by the continued placement of the ((person))offender in that environment. The ((person))offender may remain placed in a housing unit for ((persons))offenders under the age of ((eighteen))18 until such time as the secretary of corrections determines that the ((person's))offender's needs and correctional goals are no longer better met in that environment but in no case past the ((person's twenty-fifth))offender's 21st birthday.(c) ((A person transferred to the custody of the department of corrections))An offender who is under the age of ((eighteen))18 may be housed in an intensive management unit or administrative segregation unit containing offenders ((eighteen))18 years of age or older if it is necessary for the safety or security of the offender or staff. In these cases, the offender must be kept physically separate from other offenders at all times.(((3) The department of children, youth, and families must review the placement of a person over age twenty-one in the custody of the department of children, youth, and families under this section to determine whether the person should be transferred to the custody of the department of corrections. The department of children, youth, and families may determine the frequency of the review required under this subsection, but the review must occur at least once before the person reaches age twenty-three if the person's commitment period in a juvenile institution extends beyond the person's twenty-third birthday.))Sec. 8. RCW 13.40.020 and 2025 c 140 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:For the purposes of this chapter:(1) "Assessment" means an individualized examination of a child to determine the child's psychosocial needs and problems, including the type and extent of any mental health, substance abuse, or co-occurring mental health and substance abuse disorders, and recommendations for treatment. "Assessment" includes, but is not limited to, drug and alcohol evaluations, psychological and psychiatric evaluations, records review, clinical interview, and administration of a formal test or instrument;(2) "Community-based rehabilitation" means one or more of the following: Employment; attendance of information classes; literacy classes; counseling including an intake appointment, outpatient substance abuse treatment programs, outpatient mental health programs, anger management classes, education or outpatient treatment programs to prevent animal cruelty, or other services including, when appropriate, restorative justice programs; or attendance at school or other educational programs appropriate for the juvenile as determined by the school district. Placement in community-based rehabilitation programs is subject to available funds;(3) "Community-based sanctions" may include community restitution not to exceed 150 hours of community restitution;(4) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the offender as punishment for committing an offense. Community restitution may be performed through public or private organizations or through work crews;(5) "Community supervision" means an order of disposition by the court of an adjudicated youth not committed to the department or an order granting a deferred disposition. A community supervision order for a single offense may be for a period of up to two years for a sex offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030 and up to one year for other offenses. As a mandatory condition of any term of community supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to refrain from committing new offenses. As a mandatory condition of community supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to comply with the mandatory school attendance provisions of chapter 28A.225 RCW and to inform the school of the existence of this requirement. Community supervision is an individualized program comprised of one or more of the following:(a) Community-based sanctions;(b) Community-based rehabilitation;(c) Monitoring and reporting requirements;(d) Posting of a probation bond;(e) Residential treatment, where substance abuse, mental health, and/or co-occurring disorders have been identified in an assessment by a qualified mental health professional, psychologist, psychiatrist, co-occurring disorder specialist, or substance use disorder professional and a funded bed is available. If a child agrees to voluntary placement in a state-funded long-term evaluation and treatment facility, the case must follow the existing placement procedure including consideration of less restrictive treatment options and medical necessity.(i) A court may order residential treatment after consideration and findings regarding whether:(A) The referral is necessary to rehabilitate the child;(B) The referral is necessary to protect the public or the child;(C) The referral is in the child's best interest;(D) The child has been given the opportunity to engage in less restrictive treatment and has been unable or unwilling to comply; and(E) Inpatient treatment is the least restrictive action consistent with the child's needs and circumstances.(ii) In any case where a court orders a child to inpatient treatment under this section, the court must hold a review hearing no later than 60 days after the youth begins inpatient treatment, and every 30 days thereafter, as long as the youth is in inpatient treatment;(6) (("Community transition services" means a therapeutic and supportive community-based custody option in which:(a) A person serves a portion of their term of confinement residing in the community, outside of department institutions and community facilities;(b) The department supervises the person in part through the use of technology that is capable of determining or identifying the monitored person's presence or absence at a particular location;(c) The department provides access to developmentally appropriate, trauma-informed, racial equity-based, and culturally relevant programs to promote successful reentry; and(d) The department prioritizes the delivery of available programming from individuals who share characteristics with the individual being served related to: Race, ethnicity, sexual identity, and gender identity;(7))) "Confinement" means physical custody by the department of children, youth, and families in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state, or physical custody in a detention facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with any county. The county may operate or contract with vendors to operate county detention facilities. The department may operate or contract to operate detention facilities for juveniles committed to the department. Pretrial confinement or confinement of less than 31 days imposed as part of a disposition or modification order may be served consecutively or intermittently, in the discretion of the court;(((8)))(7) "Court," when used without further qualification, means the juvenile court judge(s) or commissioner(s);(((9)))(8) "Criminal history" includes all criminal complaints against the respondent for which, prior to the commission of a current offense, the allegations were found correct by a court. If a respondent is convicted of two or more charges arising out of the same course of conduct, only the highest charge from among these shall count as an offense for the purposes of this chapter. A successfully completed deferred adjudication that was entered before July 1, 1998, or a deferred disposition shall not be considered part of the respondent's criminal history. A successfully completed diversion under RCW 13.40.080 may not be considered part of the respondent's criminal history;(((10)))(9) "Custodial interrogation" means express questioning or other actions or words by a law enforcement officer which are reasonably likely to elicit an incriminating response from an individual and occurs when reasonable individuals in the same circumstances would consider themselves in custody;(((11)))(10) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families;(((12)))(11) "Detention facility" means a county facility, paid for by the county, for the physical confinement of a juvenile alleged to have committed an offense or an adjudicated offender subject to a disposition or modification order. "Detention facility" includes county group homes, inpatient substance abuse programs, juvenile basic training camps, and electronic monitoring;(((13)))(12) "Diversion unit" means any probation counselor who enters into a diversion agreement with an alleged youthful offender, or any other person, community accountability board, youth court under the supervision of the juvenile court, or other entity with whom the juvenile court administrator has contracted to arrange and supervise such agreements pursuant to RCW 13.40.080, or any person, community accountability board, or other entity specially funded by the legislature to arrange and supervise diversion agreements in accordance with the requirements of this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "community accountability board" means a board comprised of members of the local community in which the juvenile offender resides. The superior court shall appoint the members. The boards shall consist of at least three and not more than seven members. If possible, the board should include a variety of representatives from the community, such as a law enforcement officer, teacher or school administrator, high school student, parent, and business owner, and should represent the cultural diversity of the local community;(((14)))(13) "Foster care" means temporary physical care in a foster family home or group care facility as defined in RCW 74.15.020 and licensed by the department, or other legally authorized care;(((15)))(14) "Institution" means a juvenile facility established pursuant to chapters 72.05 and 72.16 through 72.20 RCW;(((16)))(15) "Intensive supervision program" means a parole program that requires intensive supervision and monitoring, offers an array of individualized treatment and transitional services, and emphasizes community involvement and support in order to reduce the likelihood a juvenile offender will commit further offenses;(((17)))(16) "Juvenile," "youth," and "child" mean any individual who is under the chronological age of 18 years and who has not been previously transferred to adult court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110, unless the individual was convicted of a lesser charge or acquitted of the charge for which he or she was previously transferred pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 or who is not otherwise under adult court jurisdiction;(((18)))(17) "Juvenile offender" means any juvenile who has been found by the juvenile court to have committed an offense, including a person 18 years of age or older over whom the juvenile court has jurisdiction under RCW 13.40.300;(((19)))(18) "Labor" means the period of time before a birth during which contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and duration to bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the cervix;(((20)))(19) "Local sanctions" means one or more of the following: (a) 0-30 days of confinement; (b) 0-12 months of community supervision; or (c) 0-150 hours of community restitution;(((21)))(20) "Manifest injustice" means a disposition that would either impose an excessive penalty on the juvenile or would impose a serious, and clear danger to society in light of the purposes of this chapter;(((22)))(21) "Monitoring and reporting requirements" means one or more of the following: Curfews; requirements to remain at home, school, work, or court-ordered treatment programs during specified hours; restrictions from leaving or entering specified geographical areas; requirements to report to the probation officer as directed and to remain under the probation officer's supervision; and other conditions or limitations as the court may require which may not include confinement;(((23)))(22) "Offense" means an act designated a violation or a crime if committed by an adult under the law of this state, under any ordinance of any city or county of this state, under any federal law, or under the law of another state if the act occurred in that state;(((24)))(23) "Physical restraint" means the use of any bodily force or physical intervention to control a juvenile offender or limit a juvenile offender's freedom of movement in a way that does not involve a mechanical restraint. Physical restraint does not include momentary periods of minimal physical restriction by direct person-to-person contact, without the aid of mechanical restraint, accomplished with limited force and designed to:(a) Prevent a juvenile offender from completing an act that would result in potential bodily harm to self or others or damage property;(b) Remove a disruptive juvenile offender who is unwilling to leave the area voluntarily; or(c) Guide a juvenile offender from one location to another;(((25)))(24) "Postpartum recovery" means (a) the entire period a woman or youth is in the hospital, birthing center, or clinic after giving birth and (b) an additional time period, if any, a treating physician determines is necessary for healing after the youth leaves the hospital, birthing center, or clinic;(((26)))(25) "Probation bond" means a bond, posted with sufficient security by a surety justified and approved by the court, to secure the offender's appearance at required court proceedings and compliance with court-ordered community supervision or conditions of release ordered pursuant to RCW 13.40.040 or 13.40.050. It also means a deposit of cash or posting of other collateral in lieu of a bond if approved by the court;(((27)))(26) "Respondent" means a juvenile who is alleged or proven to have committed an offense;(((28)))(27) "Restitution" means financial reimbursement by the offender to the victim, and shall be limited to easily ascertainable damages for injury to or loss of property, actual expenses incurred for medical treatment for physical injury to persons, lost wages resulting from physical injury, and costs of the victim's counseling reasonably related to the offense. Restitution shall not include reimbursement for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or other intangible losses. Nothing in this chapter shall limit or replace civil remedies or defenses available to the victim or offender;(((29)))(28) "Restorative justice" means practices, policies, and programs informed by and sensitive to the needs of crime victims that are designed to encourage offenders to accept responsibility for repairing the harm caused by their offense by providing safe and supportive opportunities for voluntary participation and communication between the victim, the offender, their families, and relevant community members;(((30)))(29) "Restraints" means anything used to control the movement of a person's body or limbs and includes:(a) Physical restraint; or(b) Mechanical device including but not limited to: Metal handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other hospital-type restraints, tasers, or batons;(((31) "Risk assessment tool" means the statistically valid tool used by the department to inform release or placement decisions related to security level, release within the sentencing range, community facility eligibility, community transition services eligibility, and parole. The "risk assessment tool" is used by the department to predict the likelihood of successful reentry and future criminal behavior;(32)))(30) "Screening" means a process that is designed to identify a child who is at risk of having mental health, substance abuse, or co-occurring mental health and substance abuse disorders that warrant immediate attention, intervention, or more comprehensive assessment. A screening may be undertaken with or without the administration of a formal instrument;(((33)))(31) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department;(((34)))(32) "Services" means services, including restorative justice, which provide alternatives to incarceration for those juveniles who have pleaded or been adjudicated guilty of an offense or have signed a diversion agreement pursuant to this chapter;(((35)))(33) "Sex offense" means an offense defined as a sex offense in RCW 9.94A.030;(((36)))(34) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the respondent committed the offense was for the purpose of the respondent's sexual gratification;(((37)))(35) "Surety" means an entity licensed under state insurance laws or by the state department of licensing, to write corporate, property, or probation bonds within the state, and justified and approved by the superior court of the county having jurisdiction of the case;(((38)))(36) "Transportation" means the conveying, by any means, of an incarcerated pregnant youth from the institution or detention facility to another location from the moment she leaves the institution or detention facility to the time of arrival at the other location, and includes the escorting of the pregnant incarcerated youth from the institution or detention facility to a transport vehicle and from the vehicle to the other location;(((39)))(37) "Violation" means an act or omission, which if committed by an adult, must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt, and is punishable by sanctions which do not include incarceration;(((40)))(38) "Violent offense" means a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;(((41)))(39) "Youth court" means a diversion unit under the supervision of the juvenile court.Sec. 9. RCW 13.40.205 and 2021 c 206 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A juvenile sentenced to a term of confinement to be served under the supervision of the department shall not be released from the physical custody of the department prior to the release date established under RCW 13.40.210 except as otherwise provided in this section.(2) A juvenile serving a term of confinement under the supervision of the department may be released on authorized leave from the physical custody of the department only if consistent with public safety and if:(a) Sixty percent of the minimum term of confinement has been served; and(b) The purpose of the leave is to enable the juvenile:(i) To visit the juvenile's family for the purpose of strengthening or preserving family relationships;(ii) To make plans for parole or release which require the juvenile's personal appearance in the community and which will facilitate the juvenile's reintegration into the community; or(iii) To make plans for a residential placement out of the juvenile's home which requires the juvenile's personal appearance in the community.(3) No authorized leave may exceed seven consecutive days. The total of all preminimum term authorized leaves granted to a juvenile prior to final discharge from confinement shall not exceed thirty days.(4) Prior to authorizing a leave, the secretary shall require a written leave plan, which shall detail the purpose of the leave and how it is to be achieved, the address at which the juvenile shall reside, the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave, and a statement by such person acknowledging familiarity with the leave plan and agreeing to supervise the juvenile and to notify the secretary immediately if the juvenile violates any terms or conditions of the leave. The leave plan shall include such terms and conditions as the secretary deems appropriate and shall be signed by the juvenile.(5) Upon authorizing a leave, the secretary shall issue to the juvenile an authorized leave order which shall contain the name of the juvenile, the fact that the juvenile is on leave from a designated facility, the time period of the leave, and the identity of an appropriate official of the department to contact when necessary. The authorized leave order shall be carried by the juvenile at all times while on leave.(6) Prior to the commencement of any authorized leave, the secretary shall give notice of the leave to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the juvenile will reside during the leave period. The notice shall include the identity of the juvenile, the time period of the leave, the residence of the juvenile during the leave, and the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave.(7) The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed forty-eight hours plus travel time, to meet an emergency situation such as a death or critical illness of a member of the juvenile's family. The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed the period of time medically necessary, to obtain medical care not available in a juvenile facility maintained by the department. In cases of emergency or medical leave the secretary may waive all or any portions of subsections (2)(a), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this section.(8) If requested by the juvenile's victim or the victim's immediate family, the secretary shall give notice of any leave ((or community transition services under subsection (13) of this section)) to the victim or the victim's immediate family.(9) A juvenile who violates any condition of an authorized leave plan ((or community transition services under subsection (13) of this section)) may be taken into custody and returned to the department in the same manner as an adult in identical circumstances.(10) ((Community transition services is an electronic monitoring program as that term is used in RCW 9A.76.130.(11))) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a juvenile placed in minimum security status ((or in community transition services under subsection (13) of this section)) may participate in work, educational, community restitution, or treatment programs in the community up to ((twelve))12 hours a day if approved by the secretary. Such a release shall not be deemed a leave of absence. This authorization may be increased to more than ((twelve))12 hours a day up to ((sixteen))16 hours a day if approved by the secretary and operated within the department's appropriations.(((12)))(11) Subsections (6), (7), and (8) of this section do not apply to juveniles covered by RCW 13.40.215.(((13)(a) The department may require a person in its custody to serve the remainder of the person's sentence in community transition services if the department determines that such placement is in the best interest of the person and the community using the risk assessment tool and considering the availability of appropriate placements, treatment, and programming. The department's determination described under this subsection must include consideration of the person's behavior while in confinement and any disciplinary considerations. The department shall establish appropriate conditions the person must comply with to remain in community transition services. A person must have served 60 percent of their minimum term of confinement and no less than 15 weeks of total confinement including time spent in detention prior to sentencing or the entry of a dispositional order before becoming eligible for community transition services under the authority and supervision of the department.(b) A person placed in community transition services under this section must have access to appropriate treatment and programming as determined by the department, including but not limited to:(i) Behavioral health treatment;(ii) Independent living;(iii) Employment;(iv) Education;(v) Connections to family and natural supports; and(vi) Community connections.(c) Community transition services under this section is in lieu of confinement in an institution or community facility operated by the department, and will not fulfill any period of parole required under RCW 13.40.210.(d) If a person placed in community transition services under this section violates a condition of participation in the community transition services program, or if the department determines that placement in the program is no longer in the best interests of the person or community, the person may be returned to an institution operated by the department at the department's discretion.(e) The following persons are not eligible for community transition services under this section:(i) Persons with pending charges or warrants;(ii) Persons who will be transferred to the department of corrections, who are in the custody of the department of corrections, or who are under the supervision of the department of corrections;(iii) Persons who were adjudicated or convicted of the crime of murder in the first or second degree;(iv) Persons who meet the definition of a "persistent offender" as defined under RCW 9.94A.030;(v) Level III sex offenders; and(vi) Persons requiring out-of-state placement.(14) The department shall design, or contract for the design, and implement a risk assessment tool. The tool must be designed to limit bias related to race, ethnicity, gender, and age. The risk assessment tool must be certified at least every three years based on current academic standards for assessment validation, and can be certified by the office of innovation, alignment, and accountability or an outside researcher.))Sec. 10. RCW 13.40.215 and 2021 c 206 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the earliest practicable date, and in no event later than ((thirty))30 days before discharge, parole, or any other authorized leave or release, or before transfer to a community residential facility ((or community transition services program)), the secretary shall send written notice of the discharge, parole, authorized leave or release, or transfer of a juvenile found to have committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking, to the following:(i) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the juvenile will reside; and(ii) The sheriff of the county in which the juvenile will reside.(b)(i) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the earliest practicable date, and in no event later than ((thirty))30 days before discharge, parole, or any other authorized leave or release, or before transfer to a community residential facility ((or community transition services program)), the secretary shall send written notice of the discharge, parole, authorized leave or release, or transfer of an individual who is found to have committed a violent offense or a sex offense, is ((twenty-one))21 years of age or younger, and has not received a high school diploma or its equivalent, to the designated recipient of the school where the juvenile either: (A) Was enrolled prior to incarceration or detention; or (B) has expressed an intention to enroll following his or her release. This notice must also include the restrictions described in subsection (5) of this section.(ii) The community residential facility shall provide written notice of the offender's criminal history to the designated recipient of any school that the offender attends while residing at the community residential facility and to any employer that employs the offender while residing at the community residential facility.(iii) As used in this subsection, "designated recipient" means: (A) The superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, of a common school as defined in RCW 28A.150.020 or a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW; (B) the administrator of a charter public school governed by chapter 28A.710 RCW; or (C) the administrator of a private school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW.(c) The same notice as required by (a) of this subsection shall be sent to the following, if such notice has been requested in writing about a specific juvenile:(i) The victim of the offense for which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide;(ii) Any witnesses who testified against the juvenile in any court proceedings involving the offense; and(iii) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are confidential and shall not be available to the juvenile. The notice to the chief of police or the sheriff shall include the identity of the juvenile, the residence where the juvenile will reside, the identity of the person, if any, responsible for supervising the juvenile, and the time period of any authorized leave.(d) The ((thirty))30-day notice requirements contained in this subsection shall not apply to emergency medical furloughs.(e) The existence of the notice requirements in this subsection will not require any extension of the release date in the event the release plan changes after notification.(2)(a) If a juvenile found to have committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking escapes from a facility of the department, the secretary shall immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the county in which the juvenile resided immediately before the juvenile's arrest. If previously requested, the secretary shall also notify the witnesses and the victim of the offense which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide. If the juvenile is recaptured, the secretary shall send notice to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as possible but in no event later than two working days after the department learns of such recapture.(b) The secretary may authorize a leave, for a juvenile found to have committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking, which shall not exceed ((forty-eight))48 hours plus travel time, to meet an emergency situation such as a death or critical illness of a member of the juvenile's family. The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed the time medically necessary, to obtain medical care not available in a juvenile facility maintained by the department. Prior to the commencement of an emergency or medical leave, the secretary shall give notice of the leave to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the juvenile will be during the leave period. The notice shall include the identity of the juvenile, the time period of the leave, the residence of the juvenile during the leave, and the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave. If previously requested, the department shall also notify the witnesses and victim of the offense which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the offense was a homicide.In case of an emergency or medical leave the secretary may waive all or any portion of the requirements for leaves pursuant to RCW 13.40.205 (2)(a), (3), (4), and (5).(3) If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be sent to the parents or legal guardian of the child.(4) The secretary shall send the notices required by this chapter to the last address provided to the department by the requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department with a current address.(5) Upon discharge, parole, transfer to a community residential facility, or other authorized leave or release, a convicted juvenile sex offender shall not attend a public or approved private elementary, middle, or high school that is attended by a victim or a sibling of a victim of the sex offender. The parents or legal guardians of the convicted juvenile sex offender shall be responsible for transportation or other costs associated with or required by the sex offender's change in school that otherwise would be paid by a school district.(6) For purposes of this section the following terms have the following meanings:(a) "Violent offense" means a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;(b) "Sex offense" means a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030;(c) "Stalking" means the crime of stalking as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;(d) "Next of kin" means a person's spouse, parents, siblings, and children.Sec. 11. RCW 13.22.010 and 2020 c 333 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families.(2) "Detention facility" means:(a) Any detention facility as defined under RCW 13.40.020; and(b) Any juvenile correctional facility under alternative administration operated by a consortium of counties under RCW 13.04.035.(3) "Imminent harm" means immediate and impending threat of a person causing bodily injury to self or others.(4) "Institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 13.40.020.(5) "Isolation" means confinement that occurs (a) when a youth is separated from the youth population and placed in a room for longer than ((fifteen))15 minutes for the purpose of discipline, behavior modification, or due to an imminent threat to the safety of the youth or others; and (b) in a room other than the room assigned to the youth for sleeping. Juveniles are in isolation from the moment they are separated from others until they have rejoined the population. Juveniles who are pregnant shall not be put into isolation. Maintaining appropriate gender separation does not constitute isolation.(6) "Juvenile" means:(a) Any individual who is under the chronological age of ((eighteen))18 years; and(b) Any individual under the chronological age of ((twenty-five))21 years who is confined in an institution, including an individual confined in an institution under RCW 72.01.410.(7) "Juvenile court administrator" means an administrator appointed pursuant to RCW 13.04.035.(8) "Room confinement" means a juvenile is separated from the youth population and placed in a room or cell that the juvenile is assigned to for sleeping, other than during normal sleeping hours or interim rest hours. "Room confinement" does not include time a youth requests to spend in his or her room or rest periods in between facility programming. Juveniles are in room confinement from the moment they are separated from others until they are permitted to rejoin the population.(9) "Solitary confinement" means a youth is involuntarily separated from the youth population and placed in a room or cell other than the room assigned to the youth for sleeping for longer than ((fifteen))15 minutes for punitive purposes. Different terminology does not exempt practice from being "solitary confinement."NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 13.40.301 (Department to protect younger children in confinement from older youth confined pursuant to 2018 c 162) and 2018 c 162 s 8;(2) RCW 13.04.800 (Report to legislatureâ2021 c 206 ss 2 and 3; 2019 c 322 ss 2-6; 2018 c 162) and 2021 c 206 s 9, 2019 c 322 s 5, & 2018 c 162 s 9;(3) RCW 72.01.412 (Eligibility for community transition services) and 2023 c 470 s 3018, 2021 c 206 s 2, & 2019 c 322 s 6;(4) RCW 43.216.180 (Education of students in the custody of juvenile rehabilitation facilitiesâDutiesâCreation of a comprehensive plan) and 2019 c 322 s 7;(5) 2019 c 322 s 1 (uncodified);(6) 2021 c 206 s 1 (uncodified);(7) 2021 c 206 s 8 (uncodified); and(8) 2021 c 206 s 10 (uncodified).--- END ---